Maine, session 132, LD1347.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §8105, sub-§1, as amended by PL 1999, c. 460, §1 and affected
by §2, is further amended to read:
1. Limit established. In any claim or cause of action permitted by this chapter, the
award of damages, including costs, against either a governmental entity or its employees,
or both, may not exceed $400,000 $1,250,000 for any and all claims arising out of a single
occurrence.